Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1039.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6 of the act of May 25, 1945 (P.L.1050, No.394), known as the Local Tax Collection Law, is amended to read:Section 6. Notices of Taxes.--When any duplicate of taxes assessed is issued and delivered by any taxing district to the tax collector, he shall within thirty days after receiving the tax duplicate, unless such time shall be extended by the taxing district, notify every taxable whose name appears on such duplicate: Provided, however, That a tax notice shall be sent to every taxable whose name appears on the duplicate not later than the first day of July following receipt of the tax duplicate, or 123456789101112131415161718192021 not later than fifteen days after the duplicate of taxes assessed is issued and delivered by the taxing district to the tax collector if such delivery is after the sixteenth day of June: And provided further, That municipalities that have adopted a home rule charter under [the act of April 13, 1972 (P.L.184, No.62), known as the "Home Rule Charter and Optional Plans Law,"] 53 Pa.C.S. Pt. III Subpt. E (relating to home rule and optional plan government) may establish a different date for the sending of tax notices to taxables. Such notice shall contain--(1) the date of the tax notice; (2) the rate or rates of taxation; (3) the valuation and identification of the real property of such taxpayer; (4) the occupation valuation of such taxpayer, if any; (5) the several amounts of real and personal property and personal taxes for which said taxpayer is liable for the current year; (6) the total amount of said taxes; (7) a statement that such taxes are due and payable; (8) a request for payment thereof; and (9) [an example of] the wording of to whom the payment must be made, including the [name of the account established under section 5.2, but not in the name of an individual only.] office, title or position and the name of the municipality for which the tax collector was elected or appointed, such as follows: "Tax Collector, (name of municipality)." The tax collector may not include the name of an individual as the party receiving payment . A separate notice shall be issued for each parcel of real property of a taxable. Personal property and personal taxes may be included on any one of such tax notices. Such notice shall further designate a place and time where the taxes shall be paid and state the time during which an abatement of tax will be allowed, when full amount of tax will be collected, and when an additional percentage will be 20250HB1039PN1128 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 added as a penalty. Such notice shall be mailed or delivered to the last known post office address of each of said taxables. Any such notice may include information as to taxes levied by two or more taxing districts.The Department of Community and Economic Development shall prepare a uniform form of tax notice and supply specimen copies thereof to the county commissioners of the several counties for distribution to tax collectors.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1039PN1128 - 3 - 123456789